src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no


! ==========================================================================
!! # North Saami noun declension
! ==========================================================================





!!    Bisyllabic nouns
!!!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
! - - - - - - - -



LEXICON GOAHTI-A !!≈ * **@CODE@** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
 GOAHTI ;

LEXICON GOAHTI-I  !!≈ * **@CODE@** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-U  !!≈ * **@CODE@** divided into a-i-u due to errortag-branch
 GOAHTI-IU ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;



LEXICON GOAHTI !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-OBL ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON GOAHTI-IU !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms goahte-,long/short gen
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX+Adv:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%> GOAHTI-IU-OBL ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON GOAHTILONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** Long nom-compound-forms, long gen
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTILONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Sometimes long nom-compound-forms, long gen
 :%> GOAHTILONGSHORTCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
! :%>X8 GOADE- ; ! Ditto (?)
! +Cmp/SgGen:%>X8 R ;
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON ALBMI !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Sg+Gen+Allegro+Err/Orth:%>X8 K ; !
 +Err/Orth:%>X8 GOADE- ; ! short gen comp
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON ALBMILONG !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTICMP ; ! oskooahpaheddjiid
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Err/Orthr:%> GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orths:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Ortht:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orthu:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orthv:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orthw:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
! +Sg+Gen+Allegro:%>X8 K ; !
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON GOAHTI_CGforms !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Forms that usually get CG. This lexicon is mostly meant for adding Err/Orth forms wihout CG to lemmas, which should have CG, like reabbá:reabbáid
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl

LEXICON ALBMILONGSHORT !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Long/SHORT nom-compound-forms, long gen.
 :%> GOAHTILONGCMP ;
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
! +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 :%>X4 GOADI- ; ! weak grade decl
 ! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X8 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
! +Sg+Gen+Allegro:%>X8 K ; !
   DenominalAdjsV1Long ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON AIGI !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. V-Nouns. Short nom-compound-forms, short gen.
 :%> GOAHTICMP ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;
 +Sg+Nom:%> NPx3Vflag ;
 +Der+Der/viđá+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđá K ;
 +Der+Der/viđi+Adv+Use/-PLX:»X7viđi K ;
 :%> EssV ;
 :%>X2 GOAHTA- ; ! Px sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X4 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Err/Orth:%>X6 NPx1V ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ; ! Ill sublexicon
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:%>X4 NPx3V ;
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc:%>X4st%> NPxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:%>X4t K ;
! +Err/Orth:%>X5 GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>%^DISIMP GODII- ; ! weak gr dipth simpl
 :%>X6 GOADA- ; ! AG Px
 :%>X8 GOADE-IU- ; ! Ditto (?)
 +Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:%>X4 R ; !  !Note! Same entry under GOADE-
 +Err/DerSub:X4X7 KEAHTTA ;
 +Err/DerSub:X4 KEAHTTA ;
   DenominalAdjsV1Short ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;


LEXICON STAHTA !!≈ * **@CODE@** Bisyll. Non-Gradating a-Nouns; i-Illative
 :%> STAHTACASE ;
 :%>X3 GOAHTAI ;
 +Err/Orth:%> GOAHTAI ;
! :%>W9 GOAHTAI ; illative -ai only for iija-words
   DenominalAdjsV1 ;
   DenominalAdjsV2 ;
   DenominalNounsV ;

LEXICON JOHTOLAT
! +Der4+Der/geahtes+A+Attr:#geahtes K ; !This is not right
 :00 JOHTOLAT0 ;     !! it does not have the Prop tag.
 :a%> JOHTOLAHKA- ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N:a»X6ž DIMINC ;
 +Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:i K ;
! This version without the flag is used for regular nominals. Should fix a
! number of cases with semantic flags not moved.
