src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounNoPx   !!= * **@CODE@** here goes nouns not taking Px.
ođastanproseassa+N+Sem/Process:ođastan#proseasºsa STAHTA ;
LEXICON NounPx  !!= * **@CODE@** this is the main noun lexicon
agroteknihkkárgurse+N+Sem/Edu:agro#teknihkkár#gurºse GOAHTI ;
biergobiila+N+Sem/Veh:biergo#bijºla GOAHTI-A ;
biomássá+N+Sem/Feat-measr:bio#másºsá ALBMILONG ;
birrajohtu+N+Sem/Process:birra#johºtu GOAHTILONG ;
boazolohku+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Amount:boazo#lohºku ALBMI ;
boraspiregažaldat+N+Sem/Prod-ling:bora#spire#gažaldahºk JOHTOLAT ;
bruttogávpejohtu+N+Sem/Process:brutto#gávpe#johºtu GOAHTILONG ;
bubme+N+Sem/Dummytag:bubme GOAHTI ;
buohcceluopmu+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Event:buohcci#luopmu AIGI ;
deaddorádjá+N+Sem/Plc-abstr:deaddo#rádºjá ALBMILONGSHORT ;
deappu+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Plant:deabbu GOAHTI_CGforms ;
dearvvasvuođadirektoráhta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Org:dearvvasvuođa#direktoráhta STAHTA ;
definišuvdnaeaktu+N+Sem/Semcon:definišuvdna#eakºtu GOAHTI-U ;
diehtosátnegirji+N+Sem/Txt:diehto#sátne#girºji GOAHTI-I ;
duodjelinjá+N+Sem/Edu:duodje#linºjá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
duolloviskála+N+Sem/Dummytag:duollo#viskála GOAHTI-A ;
dáiddamáhttu+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:dáidda#máhttu ALBMI ;
dánsenfálaldat+N+Sem/Prod-cogn:dánsen#fálaldahºk JOHTOLAT ;
eallinosku+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Prod-cogn:eallin#osºku ALBMILONG ;
eamiálbmotoahppu+N+Sem/Edu:eami#álbmot#oahppu AIGI ;
faláštallanlinnjá+N+Sem/Dummytag:faláštallan#linºnjá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
finánsaheahtedilli+N+Sem/State:finánsa#heahte#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
gearbmaščivga+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gearbmaš#čivºga GOAHTI-A ;
genaresursa+N+Sem/Semcon+Err/Orth:gena#resursa GOAHTI_CGforms ;
girkokáffe+N+Sem/Event:girko#káffe GOAHTI ;
girkoláđđi+N+Sem/Txt:girko#láđđi GOAHTI-I ;
golleildu+N+Sem/Furn:golle#ildu¤ GOAHTI-U ;
gárrendilli+N+Sem/State:gárren#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
hehttenlinnjá+N+Sem/Dummytag:hehtten#linºnjá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
hipmu+N+Sem/Dummytag:hipmu ALBMI ;
hurra+N+Sem/Dummytag:hurra GOAHTI-A ;
hárjehallanattáldat+N+Sem/Dummytag:hárjehallan#attáldahºk JOHTOLAT ;
jođánisgeaidnu+N+Sem/Route:jođánis#geajdnu AIGI ;
juovlabiebmojohtu+N+Sem/Process:juovla#biebmo#johºtu GOAHTILONG ;
karbohydráhta+N+Sem/Substnc:karbo#hydráhta STAHTA ;
konjáhte+N+Err/Lex+Sem/Dummytag:konjáhte GOAHTI ; !Turi, muitalus sámiid birra
lahttosearvi+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Org:lahttu#searºvi GOAHTI-I ;
liigeáhkká+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:liige#áhkká ALBMILONG ;
loaktu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgNomLeft+CmpN/SgGenLeft+CmpN/PlGenLeft+Sem/Dummytag:loakºtu GOAHTI-U ;
luoddalinjá+N+Sem/Dummytag:luodda#linºjá GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
mediadilli+N+Sem/State:media#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
miellahttu+N+Sem/Hum+Err/Orth:miel#lahttu¤ GOAHTI_CGforms ;
nannánjiekŋa+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:nannán#jiekŋa GOAHTI-A ;
neahttamárkanbáiki+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:neahtta#márkan#bájºki ALBMI ;
njuoskkádat+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Wthr:njuoskkádahºk JOHTOLAT ;
nohkkimánnu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Measr_Time:nohkki#mánnu AIGI ;
oahppanriekti+N+Sem/Rule:oahppan#riekºti GOAHTI-I ;
ollesárvu+N+CmpN/SgN+Sem/Feat:olles#árºvu GOAHTI-U ;
ođđadeastámente+N+Sem/Txt:ođđa#deastámenºte GOAHTI ;
prioritehta+N+Sem/Semcon:pri^oritehta STAHTA ;
reive+N+Sem/Txt+Err/Orth:reive GOAHTI_CGforms ;
ruhtajohtu+N+Sem/Process:ruhta#johºtu GOAHTILONG ;
rábmonlistá+N+Sem/Txt:rábmon#lisºtá ALBMILONG ;
skábmamánnu+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Time+Err/Orth-a-á:skabma#mánnu AIGI ;
smierroláibi+N+Sem/Food:smierro#lájºbi GOAHTI-I ;
sohka+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Group_Hum:sohºka GOAHTI-A ;
stipendiáhttabargu+N+Sem/Act:stipendiáhtta#barºgu ALBMI ;
stáhtabáŋku+N+Sem/Org:stáhta#báŋºku GOAHTI-U ;
stádadivanjuolggadus+N+Sem/Rule:stáda#diva#njuolggaduss JOHTOLAT ;
stáhtafinánsadilli+N+Sem/State:stáhta#finánsa#dilli ALBMILONGSHORT ;
tente+N+Sem/Dummytag:tenºte GOAHTI ;
vuordinlassi+N+Sem/Dummytag:vuordin#lassi GOAHTILONGSHORT ;
várrepresideantakandidáhta+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:várre#presideanta#kandidáhta STAHTA ;
ártnahávdi+N+Sem/Ctain:ártna#hávºdi GOAHTI-I ;
árvojohtu+N+Sem/Process:árvo#johºtu GOAHTILONG ;
čuohppanleaktu+N+Sem/Feat-measr:čuohppan#leakºtu GOAHTI-U ;
čuojahankorpsa+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Org:čuojahan#korpsa GOAHTI_CGforms ;
čállinbihttá+N+Sem/Txt:čállin#bihttá ALBMILONG ;
